California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(1) “Decision 20-05-053” means Decision 20-05-053 (May 28, 2019) Decision Approving Reorganization Plan in Investigation 19-09-016 (September 26, 2019) Order Instituting Investigation on the Commission’s Own Motion to Consider the Ratemaking and Other Implications of a Proposed Plan for Resolution of Voluntary Case filed by Pacific Gas and Electric Company Pursuant to Chapter 11 of the Bankruptcy Code, in the United States Bankruptcy Court, Northern District of California, San Francisco Division, In re Pacific Gas and Electric Corporation and Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Case No. 19-30088.

(2) “Pacific Gas and Electric Company” means Pacific Gas and Electric Company, PG&E Corporation, any subsidiary or affiliate of the foregoing holding any assets related to the provision of electrical
 or gas service within Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s service territory, and any successor to any of the foregoing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 36.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1826.

Whenever the commission determines, after notice and hearing, that any water or sewer system corporation is unable or unwilling to adequately serve its ratepayers, has been actually or effectively abandoned by its owners, or is unresponsive to the rules or orders of the commission, the commission may petition the superior court for the county within which the corporation has its principal office or place of business for the appointment of a receiver to assume possession of its property and to operate its system upon such terms and conditions as the court shall prescribe. The court may require, as a condition to the appointment of the receiver, that a sufficient bond be given by the receiver and conditioned upon compliance with
 the orders of the court and the commission, and the protection of all property rights involved. The court shall provide for disposition of the facilities and system in like manner as any other receivership proceeding in this state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 855 by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 8.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Official Documents and Fees [1901. - 1905.]

1901.

Copies of all official documents and orders filed or deposited according to law in the office of the commission, certified by a commissioner or by the executive director or an assistant executive director under the official seal of the commission to be true copies of the originals, shall be evidence in like manner as the originals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

Every order, authorization, or certificate issued or approved by the commission under the following provisions of this part shall be in writing and entered on the records of the commission:

(a) Sections 764 to 767, inclusive.

(b) Sections 816 to 829, inclusive.

(c) Sections 851 to 853, inclusive.

(d) Sections 1001 to 1010, inclusive.

(e) Sections 1201 to 1220, inclusive.

Any order, authorization, or certificate, or a copy thereof, or a copy of the record thereof, certified by a commissioner or by the executive director or the assistant executive director under the official seal of the commission to be a true copy of the original, may be recorded in the office of the recorder of any county, or city and county, in which is located the principal place of business of any public utility affected thereby, or in which is situated any property of any such public utility, and that record is public notice. A certificate under the seal of the commission that any order, authorization, or certificate has not been modified, stayed, suspended, or revoked may also be recorded in the same offices in the same manner and with like effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

The commission shall fix the fees to be charged for the making and furnishing of copies, including certified copies, of papers, records, and documents of the commission. These charges shall as nearly as practicable reflect the costs of furnishing the materials and providing the service.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1088, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

The commission shall also charge and collect the following fees:

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1036 for filing each application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, or for the mortgage, lease, transfer, or assignment thereof, five hundred dollars ($500). The commission may adjust this fee based on the Consumer Price Index.

(b) For a certificate authorizing an issue of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, two dollars ($2) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) of the face value of the authorized issue or fraction thereof up to one million dollars ($1,000,000), one dollar ($1) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) over one million dollars ($1,000,000) and up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000), and fifty cents ($0.50) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) over ten million dollars ($10,000,000), with a minimum fee in any case of fifty dollars ($50). No fee need be paid on such portion of any such issue as may be used to guarantee, take over, refund, discharge, or retire any stock, bond,
 note, or other evidence of indebtedness on which a fee has theretofore been paid to the commission. If the commission modified the amount of the issue requested in any case and the applicant thereupon elects not to avail itself of the commission’s authorization, no fee shall be paid, and if such fee is paid prior to the issuance of such certificate by the commission, such fee shall be returned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (SB 631)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.1.

The commission shall also charge and collect a fee for a certificate authorizing an issue of stock, which fee shall be computed at the rates set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1904 and determined by the commission upon the basis of the proposed maximum proceeds. No fee shall be paid on such portion of any such issue as may be used to guarantee, take over, refund, discharge, or retire any stock, bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness on which a fee has theretofore been paid to the commission.

If the commission modifies the amount of the issue requested in any case and the applicant thereupon elects not to avail itself of the commission’s authorization, no fee shall be paid, and if such fee is paid prior to the issuance of such certificate by the commission, such fee shall be refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.2.

(a) In every case in which an applicant’s security issues are subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission pursuant to Section 204 of the Federal Power Act (49 Stat. 850, 16 U.S.C. 824c) or the applicant is an electrical or gas corporation whose security issues are subject to the jurisdiction of a public utilities regulatory agency of another state, no fees shall be charged and collected pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1904 and pursuant to Section 1904.1 for any face value of the bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, or the proposed maximum proceeds of stock, as the case may be, which exceeds the face value or maximum proceeds bearing the same proportion to the total face value or maximum proceeds as the gross operating revenues of the applicant derived from operations within the state bear to all of the applicant’s gross operating revenues.

(b) As used in this section, “gross operating revenues” means such revenues as are shown on the accounts of the applicant as of the close of the calendar year immediately preceding the issuance by the commission of the certificate for which fees are charged and collected pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1904 or pursuant to Section 1904.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

No fees shall be charged or collected for copies of papers, records, or official documents, furnished to public officers for use in their official capacity, or for the annual reports of the commission in the ordinary course of distribution, but the commission may fix reasonable charges for publications issued under its authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 213.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Violations [2100. - 2120.]

2100.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing, finds that any common carrier, other than a railroad corporation, has charged, collected, or received a lesser compensation for the transportation of persons or property, or for any service in connection therewith, than the applicable rates, fares, and charges specified in its tariff schedules filed and in effect at the time, or that the carrier has refunded or remitted in any manner or by any device any portion of the rates, fares, or charges so specified without an order of the commission so authorizing, or charged, collected, or received a lesser compensation than that established by the commission under
 subdivision (b) of Section 493, the commission shall require the carrier to collect the undercharges involved and may impose upon the carrier a fine equal to the amount of the undercharges. These fines shall be deposited in the General Fund.

The remedy and penalty provided by this section shall be cumulative and shall not be a bar to or affect any other remedy or penalty provided for in this part, or to the exercise by the commission of its power to punish for contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1369, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

The commission shall see that the provisions of the Constitution and statutes of this State affecting public utilities, the enforcement of which is not specifically vested in some other officer or tribunal, are enforced and obeyed, and that violations thereof are promptly prosecuted and penalties due the State therefor recovered and collected, and to this end it may sue in the name of the people of the State of California. Upon the request of the commission, the Attorney General or the district attorney of the proper county or city and county shall aid in any investigation, hearing, or trial had under the provisions of this part, and shall institute and prosecute actions or
 proceedings for the enforcement of the provisions of the Constitution and statutes of this State affecting public utilities and for the punishment of all violations thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

Whenever the commission is of the opinion that any public utility is failing or omitting or about to fail or omit, to do anything required of it by law, or by any order, decision, rule, direction, or requirement of the commission, or is doing anything or about to do anything, or permitting anything or about to permit anything to be done, in violation of law or of any order, decision, rule, direction, or requirement of the commission, it shall direct the attorney of the commission to commence an action or proceeding in the superior court in and for the county, or city and county, in which the cause or some part thereof arose, or in which the corporation complained of has its
 principal place of business, or in which the person complained of resides, for the purpose of having such violations or threatened violations stopped and prevented, either by mandamus or injunction. The attorney of the commission shall thereupon begin such action or proceeding in the name of the people of the State of California, by petition to such superior court, alleging the violation or threatened violation complained of, and praying for appropriate relief by way of mandamus or injunction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to Section 2102, the court shall specify a time, not exceeding 20 days after the service of the copy of the petition, within which the public utility complained of shall answer the petition, and in the meantime the public utility may be restrained. In case of default in answer, or after answer, the court shall immediately inquire into the facts and circumstances of the case. Such corporations or persons as the court deems necessary or proper to be joined as parties, in order to make its judgment, order or writ effective, may be joined as parties. The final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall either dismiss the action or
 proceeding or direct that the writ of mandamus or injunction issue or be made permanent as prayed for in the petition, or in such modified or other form as will afford appropriate relief. An appeal may be taken to the Supreme Court from such final judgment in the same manner and with the same effect, subject to the provisions of this part, as appeals are taken from judgments of the superior court in other actions for mandamus or injunction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

(a) Except as provided by Sections 2100 and 2107.5, actions to recover penalties under this part shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California, in the superior court in and for the county, or city and county, in which the cause or some part thereof arose, or in which the corporation complained of has its principal place of business, or in which the person complained of resides. The action shall be commenced and prosecuted to final judgment by the attorney or agent of the commission. All fines and penalties may be sued for and recovered. The commission may enjoin the sale of a public utility’s or common carrier’s assets to satisfy unpaid fines and penalties. The commission may use any of the remedies afforded to a creditor under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act
 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code). Respondents who fraudulently transfer assets to avoid paying commission-imposed fines or penalties are subject to prosecution under Sections 154, 531, and 531a of the Penal Code. In all of these actions, the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same as in ordinary civil actions, except for prosecutions under the Penal Code or as otherwise herein provided. All fines and penalties recovered by the state in any action, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund. Any action may be compromised or discontinued on application of the commission upon the terms the court approves and orders.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 28.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.5.

Any penalty for violation of any provision of this act, or of any rule, regulation, general order, or order of the commission, involving safety standards for pipeline facilities or the transportation of gas in the State of California may be compromised by the commission. In determining the amount of such penalty, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the appropriateness of such penalty to the size of the business of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance, after notification of a violation, shall be considered. The amount of any such penalty, when finally determined, or the amount agreed
 upon in compromise, may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the People of the State of California in the superior court in and for the county, or city and county in which the cause or some part thereof arose, or in which the corporation complained of has its principal place of business or the person complained of resides. In any such action, all penalties incurred, or amounts agreed upon in compromise for violations committed up to the time of commencing the action may be sued for and recovered. In all such actions, the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same as in ordinary civil actions, except as otherwise herein provided. All fines and penalties recovered by the state in any such action, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 520.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2104, all moneys collected pursuant to any settlements, unless restricted by a court for another purpose, abatement orders, fines, or penalties by the commission from a gas corporation serving the Los Angeles Basin pursuant to an administrative enforcement or legal proceeding relating to the well failure at the Aliso Canyon natural gas storage facility first reported to the commission in October 2015 shall be deposited in the Aliso Canyon Recovery Account, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the account may be allocated, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of mitigating impacts on local air quality, public health, and ratepayers resulting from the well failure at Aliso Canyon, including evaluation of any negative effects on public health and
 enhancing the cost-effectiveness and feasibility of implementing Sections 380.6 and 2836.7.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Los Angeles Basin” means the area identified as the “Aliso Canyon Delivery Area” on page 11 of the Aliso Canyon Risk Assessment Technical Report, dated April 5, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 814, Sec. 2.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

All penalties accruing under this part shall be cumulative, and a suit for the recovery of one penalty shall not be a bar to or affect the recovery of any other penalty or forfeiture or be a bar to any criminal prosecution against any public utility, or any officer, director, agent, or employee thereof, or any other corporation or person, or to the exercise by the commission of its power to punish for contempt.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

Any public utility which does, causes to be done, or permits any act, matter, or thing prohibited or declared unlawful, or which omits to do any act, matter, or thing required to be done, either by the Constitution, any law of this State, or any order or decision of the commission, shall be liable to the persons or corporations affected thereby for all loss, damages, or injury caused thereby or resulting therefrom. If the court finds that the act or omission was wilful, it may, in addition to the actual damages, award exemplary damages. An action to recover for such loss, damage, or injury may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction by any corporation or person.

No recovery as provided in this section shall in any manner affect a recovery by the State of the penalties provided in this part or the exercise by the commission of its power to punish for contempt.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

Any public utility that violates or fails to comply with any provision of the Constitution of this state or of this part, or that fails or neglects to comply with any part or provision of any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission, in a case in which a penalty has not otherwise been provided, is subject to a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 37.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.5.

When the commission finds, after hearing, that any person or corporation has knowingly aided or abetted a common carrier in violating Section 458 or has violated Section 459, or any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement issued under those provisions, the commission may impose a fine for each violation not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). In addition to the fine, the commission may impose interest on the fine, not to exceed the maximum rate of interest provided for in Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution. Interest
 shall commence to accrue on the date when the payment of the fine becomes delinquent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 25.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2108.

Every violation of the provisions of this part or of any part of any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission, by any corporation or person is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation each day’s continuance thereof shall be a separate and distinct offense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2109.

In construing and enforcing the provisions of this part relating to penalties, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee of any public utility, acting within the scope of his official duties or employment, shall in every case be the act, omission, or failure of such public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.

Every public utility and every officer, agent, or employee of any public utility, who violates or fails to comply with, or who procures, aids, or abets any violation by any public utility of any provision of the California Constitution or of this part, or who fails to comply with any part of any order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission, or who procures, aids, or abets any public utility in the
 violation or noncompliance in a case in which a penalty has not otherwise been provided, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 464, Sec. 2.   (AB 861)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

Every corporation or person, other than a public utility and its officers, agents, or employees, which or who knowingly violates or fails to comply with, or procures, aids or abets any violation of any provision of the California Constitution relating to public utilities or of this part, or fails to comply with any part of any order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission, or who procures, aids, or
 abets any public utility in the violation or noncompliance, in a case in which a penalty has not otherwise been provided for the corporation or person, is subject to a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 464, Sec. 3.   (AB 861)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

Every person who, either individually, or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of a corporation other than a public utility, violates any provision of this part, or fails to comply with any part of any order, decision, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission, or who procures, aids, or abets any public utility in such violation or noncompliance, in a case in which a penalty has not otherwise been provided for such person, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who willfully violates the provisions of Section 588 is guilty of a misdemeanor, subject to a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 112, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.

Every public utility, corporation, or person which fails to comply with any part of any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission or any commissioner is in contempt of the commission, and is punishable by the commission for contempt in the same manner and to the same extent as contempt is punished by courts of record. The remedy prescribed in this section does not bar or affect any other remedy prescribed in this part, but is cumulative and in addition thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2114.

Any public utility on whose behalf any agent or officer thereof who, having taken an oath that he will testify, declare, depose or certify truly before the commission, willfully and contrary to such oath states or submits as true any material matter which he knows to be false, or who testifies, declares, deposes, or certifies under penalty of perjury and willfully states as true any material matter which he knows to be false, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1264.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.

Whenever the commission determines that a railroad corporation has violated any order of the commission concerning the adequacy, condition, or safety of the corporation’s cars or tracks or any related fixture or appliance, the commission may impose upon the corporation a fine of not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each violation or a fine of not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for each day that a violation continues uncorrected. The commission may assess interest upon any fine imposed, which shall commence upon the day the payment of the fine is delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 618, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2117.

(a) Whenever a written notice to appear has been mailed to the owner of a passenger stage, an exact and legible duplicate copy of the notice, when filed with the magistrate in lieu of a verified complaint, is a complaint to which the defendant may plead guilty.

(b) If, however, the defendant fails to appear, does not deposit bail, or pleads other than guilty to the offense charged, a complaint shall be filed which conforms to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 948) of Title 5 of
 Part 2 of the Penal Code and which shall be deemed to be an original complaint, and thereafter the proceeding shall be held as provided by law, except that the defendant may, by an agreement in writing, subscribed by the defendant and filed with the court, waive the filing of a verified complaint and elect that the prosecution may proceed upon a written notice to appear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 26.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2119.

Every passenger stage corporation and every officer, director, agent, or employee of a passenger stage corporation, who displays on any vehicle any identifying symbol other than one prescribed by the commission pursuant to Section 1038.5, or who fails to remove an identifying symbol when required by the commission, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 27.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2120.

(a) The commission shall not distribute, expend, or encumber any moneys received by the commission as a result of any commission proceeding or judicial action, including the compromise or settlement of a claim, until both of the following are true:

(1) The commission has provided the Director of Finance with written notification of the receipt of the moneys and the basis for those moneys being received by the commission.

(2) The Director of Finance provides not less than 60 days’ written notice to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the appropriate budget subcommittees of the Senate and Assembly of the receipt of
 the moneys and the basis for those moneys being received by the commission.

(b) This section does not apply to application or licensing fees charged by the commission to defray regulatory expenses.

(c) This section does not apply to moneys received by the commission in a court-approved settlement or as a result of a court judgment where the court orders that the moneys be used for specified purposes.

(d) This section does not apply to moneys received by the commission where statutes expressly provide how the moneys are to be paid or used, including all of the following:

(1) Payment to any fund created by Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 270).

(2) Payment to any account or fund pursuant
 to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 401).

(3) Payment to the Ratepayer Relief Fund pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 16428.1) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 154.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. SPECIFIC PUBLIC UTILITIES [2701. - 2899.]



  CHAPTER 2. Water Companies [2701. - 2715.]

2701.

Any person, firm, or corporation, their lessees, trustees, receivers or trustees appointed by any court whatsoever, owning, controlling, operating, or managing any water system within this State, who sells, leases, rents, or delivers water to any person, firm, corporation, municipality, or any other political subdivision of the State, whether under contract or otherwise, is a public utility, and is subject to the provisions of Part 1 of Division 1 and to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

Any corporation or association which is organized for the purpose of delivering water solely to its stockholders or members at cost, and which delivers water to others than its stockholders or members, or to the state or any department or agency thereof or any school district, or to any other mutual water company, for compensation, is a public utility and is subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) and to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

2703.

Any corporation or association which is organized both for the purpose of delivering water to its stockholders or members at cost, and to persons, firms, corporations, municipalities, or other political subdivisions of the state, is a public utility and is subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) and to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 131.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.

Any owner of a water supply not otherwise dedicated to public use and primarily used for domestic or industrial purposes by him or for the irrigation of his lands, who (a) sells or delivers the surplus of such water for domestic or school district purposes or for the irrigation of adjoining lands, or (b) in an emergency water shortage sells or delivers water from such supply to others for a limited period not to exceed one irrigation season, or (c) sells or delivers a portion of such water supply as a matter of accommodation to neighbors to whom no other supply of water for domestic or irrigation purposes is
 equally available, is not subject to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 348.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.

Any corporation or association that is organized for the purposes of delivering water to its stockholders and members at cost, including use of works for conserving, treating, and reclaiming water, and that delivers water to no one except its stockholders or members, or to the state or any agency or department thereof, to any city, county, school district, or other public district, or any federal agency that provides fire protection or operates park facilities, or to any other mutual water company, at cost, is not a public utility, and is not subject to the
 jurisdiction, control or regulation of the commission. However, a mutual water company may perform the following acts without becoming a public utility and becoming subject to the jurisdiction, control or regulation of the commission:

(a) May deliver water at cost to any lessee of its stock or shares or other evidence of membership where the lease is in writing signed by the owner of the stock or shares or other evidence of membership and the lessee thereof and approved by the mutual water company.

(b) May deliver water at cost to any land leased by a stockholder, shareholder, or member of the mutual water company to a person not a stockholder, shareholder or member thereof, provided the lease is in writing signed by the stockholder, shareholder or member and the lessee of the land and approved by the mutual water company.

(c) May transfer water or water rights to, or exchange water or water rights with, another entity pursuant to state or federal law, or both.

(d) In a bona fide water emergency, but for no longer than the existence of the emergency, may deliver water at cost to any person owning or leasing real property located within or adjacent to the service area of the mutual water company, provided that the water is delivered pursuant to a written contract signed by the mutual water company and the person to whom the water is delivered.

(e) May deliver water pursuant to any contract for water service made:

(1) In settlement of litigation involving disputed water rights or any judgment in the litigation.

(2) In consideration of the conveyance of a well,
 water right, or easement for water distribution purposes.

All of these leases and contracts shall be preserved for a period of 10 years by a mutual water company and shall be subject to inspection by the commission.

The term “cost” as used in this section shall be construed to mean without profit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 420, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.5.

Any person or corporation, and their lessees, receivers, or trustees appointed by any court, that maintains a mobilehome park or a multiple unit residential complex and provides, or will provide, water service to users through a submeter service system is not a public utility and is not subject to the jurisdiction, control, or regulation of the commission if each user of the submeter service system is charged at the rate which would be applicable if the user were receiving the water directly from the water corporation, or if management of the mobilehome park complies with subdivision (c) of Section 798.40 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 807, Sec. 2.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.6.

(a) (1) A mobilehome park that provides water service only to its tenants from water supplies and facilities that it owns, not otherwise dedicated to public service, is not a water corporation. However, if a complaint is filed with the commission by tenants of the mobilehome park that represent 10 percent or more of the park’s water service connections during any 12-month period,
 claiming that the water rates charged by the park are not just and reasonable or that the service is inadequate, the commission shall have jurisdiction to determine the merits of the complaint and shall determine, based on all the facts and circumstances, whether the rates charged are just and reasonable and whether the service provided is adequate.

(2) The numerical threshold of persons may include former or current tenants, or both.

(3) A person shall not file a complaint against a mobilehome park pursuant to paragraph (1) if that person has not resided in that mobilehome park within the last five years.

(b) Complaints filed pursuant to subdivision (a) are subject to this code and to the Rules of Practice and Procedure of the commission governing complaints and commission investigations.

(c) (1) A mobilehome park, as described in subdivision (a), shall provide written notice to each of the mobilehome park’s tenants to inform those tenants of their right to, and how to, file a complaint with the commission about the water rates charged or the service provided by the mobilehome park. With respect to the notice, the mobilehome park shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide the notice to new tenants at the time the tenants establish residence within the mobilehome park.

(B) Provide the notice to tenants each time the mobilehome park changes water rates or service.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the notice provided by a mobilehome park pursuant
 to paragraph (1) shall be written in English, the languages set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1632 of the Civil Code, and the language or languages of primary communication with the residents receiving the notice.

(B) The commission shall prepare and make available on its Internet Web site an approved notice in English and the languages set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1632 of the Civil Code. In providing notice pursuant to paragraph (1), a mobilehome park shall use the then-current language made available by the commission pursuant to this subparagraph.

(3) A mobilehome park that fails to provide the notice required by this subdivision shall be subject to the penalties established in Section 2111.

(d) The commission may afford rate relief or may order the mobilehome park to improve its water supply,
 facilities, and services on those terms that it finds just and reasonable, or both.

(e) If the commission finds, after investigation, that the mobilehome park has charged an unjust or unreasonable rate in violation of this section subsequent to December 31, 2012, the commission shall order the mobilehome park to reimburse the complainants and any other current and former tenants affected by the rate, if no discrimination will result from the reimbursement. Reimbursement shall be calculated from the first date of collection of the unjust or unreasonable rate, with interest. The commission shall not make an order for the payment of reimbursement upon the ground of unjustness or unreasonableness if the rate in question has been previously declared by formal finding of the commission to be reasonable. The commission shall not recognize the assignment of a reimbursement claim except assignments by operation of law as in cases of death, insanity,
 bankruptcy, receivership, or order of court.

(f) The public advisor created pursuant to Section 321 and necessary staff of the commission shall assist the complainants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 539, Sec. 2.   (AB 1830)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2706.
